Ohio, session 136, SB385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 109.572, 4731.07, 4731.071, 4731.224, 4731.2210, 4731.24, 4731.25, 4731.251, 4776.01, and 4776.20 be amended and sections 4789.02, 4789.03, 4789.04, 4789.05, 4789.06, 4789.07, 4789.08, 4789.09, 4789.10, 4789.11, 4789.12, and 4789.99 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 109.572. (A)(1) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 121.08, 3301.32, 3301.541, or 3319.39 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.17, 2923.21, 2923.42, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.31, 2925.32, 2925.36, 2925.37, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, or a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense; (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(1)(a) of this section; (c) If the request is made pursuant to section 3319.39 of the Revised Code for an applicant who is a teacher, any offense specified under section 9.79 of the Revised Code or in section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. (2) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3712.09 or 3721.121 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person who has applied for employment in a position for which a criminal records check is required by those sections. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.12, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.40, 2913.43, 2913.47, 2913.51, 2919.25, 2921.36, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; (b) An existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (3) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 173.27, 173.38, 173.381, 3740.11, 5119.34, 5164.34, 5164.341, 5164.342, 5123.081, or 5123.169 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check of the person for whom the request is made. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of, has pleaded guilty to, or (except in the case of a request pursuant to section 5164.34, 5164.341, or 5164.342 of the Revised Code) has been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for any of the following, regardless of the date of the conviction, the date of entry of the guilty plea, or (except in the case of a request pursuant to section 5164.34, 5164.341, or 5164.342 of the Revised Code) the date the person was found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction: (a) A violation of section 959.13, 959.131, 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.15, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.34, 2903.341, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2905.32, 2905.33, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2907.33, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.04, 2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.05, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.40, 2913.41, 2913.42, 2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.441, 2913.45, 2913.46, 2913.47, 2913.48, 2913.49, 2913.51, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2919.12, 2919.121, 2919.123, 2919.124, 2919.22, 2919.23, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2921.03, 2921.11, 2921.12, 2921.13, 2921.21, 2921.24, 2921.32, 2921.321, 2921.34, 2921.35, 2921.36, 2921.51, 2923.12, 2923.122, 2923.123, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.162, 2923.21, 2923.32, 2923.42, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.09, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.14, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.36, 2925.55, 2925.56, 2927.12, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; (b) Felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code; (c) A violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996; (d) A violation of section 2923.01, 2923.02, or 2923.03 of the Revised Code when the underlying offense that is the object of the conspiracy, attempt, or complicity is one of the offenses listed in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (c) of this section; (e) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (d) of this section. (4) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 2151.86, 2151.904, or 5103.053 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 959.13, 2151.421, 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.15, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.32, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2913.49, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.17, 2923.21, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.31, 2925.32, 2925.36, 2925.37, 2927.12, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense, two or more OVI or OVUAC violations committed within the three years immediately preceding the submission of the application or petition that is the basis of the request, or felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, or a violation of Chapter 2919. of the Revised Code that is a felony; (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(4)(a) of this section. (5) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 5104.013 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2151.421, 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.22, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.04, 2909.05, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.041, 2913.05, 2913.06, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.33, 2913.34, 2913.40, 2913.41, 2913.42, 2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.441, 2913.45, 2913.46, 2913.47, 2913.48, 2913.49, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.224, 2919.225, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2921.03, 2921.11, 2921.13, 2921.14, 2921.34, 2921.35, 2923.01, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense, a violation of section 2923.02 or 2923.03 of the Revised Code that relates to a crime specified in this division, or a second violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code within five years of the date of application for licensure or certification. (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses or violations described in division (A)(5)(a) of this section. (6) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 5153.111 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, or a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense; (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(6)(a) of this section. (7) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check from an individual pursuant to section 4749.03 or 4749.06 of the Revised Code, accompanied by a completed copy of the form prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state or in any other state. If the individual indicates that a firearm will be carried in the course of business, the superintendent shall require information from the federal bureau of investigation as described in division (B)(2) of this section. Subject to division (F) of this section, the superintendent shall report the findings of the criminal records check and any information the federal bureau of investigation provides to the director of public safety. (8) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 1321.37, 1321.53, or 4763.05 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person who has applied for a license, permit, or certification from the department of commerce or a division in the department. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state, any other state, or the United States. (9) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check from the treasurer of state under section 113.041 of the Revised Code or from an individual under section 928.03, 4701.08, 4715.101, 4717.061, 4725.121, 4725.501, 4729.071, 4729.53, 4729.90, 4729.92, 4730.101, 4730.14, 4730.28, 4731.081, 4731.15, 4731.171, 4731.222, 4731.281, 4731.531, 4732.091, 4734.202, 4740.061, 4741.10, 4747.051, 4751.20, 4751.201, 4751.21, 4753.061, 4755.70, 4757.101, 4759.061, 4760.032, 4760.06, 4761.051, 4762.031, 4762.06, 4774.031, 4774.06, 4776.021, 4778.04, 4778.07, 4779.091, or 4783.04, 4789.04, or 4789.07 of the Revised Code, accompanied by a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state or any other state. Subject to division (F) of this section, the superintendent shall send the results of a check requested under section 113.041 of the Revised Code to the treasurer of state and shall send the results of a check requested under any of the other listed sections to the licensing board specified by the individual in the request. (10) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 124.74, 718.131, 1121.23, 1315.141, 1733.47, or 1761.26 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States. (11) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check from an appointing or licensing authority under section 3772.07 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner prescribed in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest to any offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that makes the person ineligible for appointment or retention under section 3772.07 of the Revised Code or that is a disqualifying offense as defined in that section or substantially equivalent to a disqualifying offense, as applicable. (12) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 2151.33 or 2151.412 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person for whom a criminal records check is required under that section. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.12, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.40, 2913.43, 2913.47, 2913.51, 2919.25, 2921.36, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; (b) An existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(12)(a) of this section. (13) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3796.12 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under division (B)(2)(b) of section 3796.03 of the Revised Code if the person who is the subject of the request is an administrator or other person responsible for the daily operation of, or an owner or prospective owner, officer or prospective officer, or board member or prospective board member of, an entity seeking a license from the department of commerce under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. (14) On receipt of a request required by section 3796.13 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under section 9.79 and division (B) of section 3796.03 of the Revised Code if the person who is the subject of the request is seeking employment with an entity licensed by the department of commerce under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. (15) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 4768.06 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state or in any other state. (16) On receipt of a request pursuant to division (B) of section 4764.07 or division (A) of section 4735.143 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in any state or the United States. (17) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check under section 147.022 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner prescribed in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest to any criminal offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States. (18) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to division (F) of section 2915.081 or division (E) of section 2915.082 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest to any offense that is a violation of Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code or to any offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to such an offense. (19) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3775.03 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section and shall request information from the federal bureau of investigation to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of any offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is a disqualifying offense as defined in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code. (B) Subject to division (F) of this section, the superintendent shall conduct any criminal records check to be conducted under this section as follows: (1) The superintendent shall review or cause to be reviewed any relevant information gathered and compiled by the bureau under division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code that relates to the person who is the subject of the criminal records check, including, if the criminal records check was requested under section 113.041, 121.08, 124.74, 173.27, 173.38, 173.381, 718.131, 928.03, 1121.23, 1315.141, 1321.37, 1321.53, 1733.47, 1761.26, 2151.86, 3301.32, 3301.541, 3319.39, 3740.11, 3712.09, 3721.121, 3772.07, 3775.03, 3796.12, 3796.13, 4729.071, 4729.53, 4729.90, 4729.92, 4749.03, 4749.06, 4763.05, 4764.07, 4768.06, 5103.053, 5104.013, 5164.34, 5164.341, 5164.342, 5123.081, 5123.169, or 5153.111 of the Revised Code, any relevant information contained in records that have been sealed under section 2953.32 of the Revised Code; (2) If the request received by the superintendent asks for information from the federal bureau of investigation, the superintendent shall request from the federal bureau of investigation any information it has with respect to the person who is the subject of the criminal records check, including fingerprint-based checks of national crime information databases as described in 42 U.S.C. 671 if the request is made pursuant to section 2151.86, 5103.053, or 5104.013 of the Revised Code or if any other Revised Code section requires fingerprint-based checks of that nature, and shall review or cause to be reviewed any information the superintendent receives from that bureau. If a request under section 3319.39 of the Revised Code asks only for information from the federal bureau of investigation, the superintendent shall not conduct the review prescribed by division (B)(1) of this section. (3) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee may request criminal history records from other states or the federal government pursuant to the national crime prevention and privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised Code. (4) The superintendent shall include in the results of the criminal records check a list or description of the offenses listed or described in the relevant provision of division (A) of this section. The superintendent shall exclude from the results any information the dissemination of which is prohibited by federal law. (5) The superintendent shall send the results of the criminal records check to the person to whom it is to be sent not later than the following number of days after the date the superintendent receives the request for the criminal records check, the completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and the set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section: (a) If the superintendent is required by division (A) of this section (other than division (A)(3) of this section) to conduct the criminal records check, thirty; (b) If the superintendent is required by division (A)(3) of this section to conduct the criminal records check, sixty. (C)(1) The superintendent shall prescribe a form to obtain the information necessary to conduct a criminal records check from any person for whom a criminal records check is to be conducted under this section. The form that the superintendent prescribes pursuant to this division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, or in both tangible and electronic formats. (2) The superintendent shall prescribe standard impression sheets to obtain the fingerprint impressions of any person for whom a criminal records check is to be conducted under this section. Any person for whom a records check is to be conducted under this section shall obtain the fingerprint impressions at a county sheriff's office, municipal police department, or any other entity with the ability to make fingerprint impressions on the standard impression sheets prescribed by the superintendent. The office, department, or entity may charge the person a reasonable fee for making the impressions. The standard impression sheets the superintendent prescribes pursuant to this division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, or in both tangible and electronic formats. (3) Subject to division (D) of this section, the superintendent shall prescribe and charge a reasonable fee for providing a criminal records check under this section. The person requesting the criminal records check shall pay the fee prescribed pursuant to this division. In the case of a request under section 1121.23, 1155.03, 1163.05, 1315.141, 1733.47, 1761.26, 2151.33, 2151.412, or 5164.34 of the Revised Code, the fee shall be paid in the manner specified in that section. (4) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation may prescribe methods of forwarding fingerprint impressions and information necessary to conduct a criminal records check, which methods shall include, but not be limited to, an electronic method. (D) The results of a criminal records check conducted under this section, other than a criminal records check specified in division (A)(7) of this section, are valid for the person who is the subject of the criminal records check for a period of one year from the date upon which the superintendent completes the criminal records check. If during that period the superintendent receives another request for a criminal records check to be conducted under this section for that person, the superintendent shall provide the results from the previous criminal records check of the person at a lower fee than the fee prescribed for the initial criminal records check. (E) When the superintendent receives a request for information from a registered private provider, the superintendent shall proceed as if the request was received from a school district board of education under section 3319.39 of the Revised Code. The superintendent shall apply division (A)(1)(c) of this section to any such request for an applicant who is a teacher. (F)(1) Subject to division (F)(2) of this section, all information regarding the results of a criminal records check conducted under this section that the superintendent reports or sends under division (A)(7) or (9) of this section to the director of public safety, the treasurer of state, or the person, board, or entity that made the request for the criminal records check shall relate to the conviction of the subject person, or the subject person's plea of guilty to, a criminal offense. (2) Division (F)(1) of this section does not limit, restrict, or preclude the superintendent's release of information that relates to the arrest of a person who is eighteen years of age or older, to an adjudication of a child as a delinquent child, or to a criminal conviction of a person under eighteen years of age in circumstances in which a release of that nature is authorized under division (E)(2), (3), or (4) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code pursuant to a rule adopted under division (E)(1) of that section. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Criminal records check" means any criminal records check conducted by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation in accordance with division (B) of this section. (2) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "OVI or OVUAC violation" means a violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. (4) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or entity registered with the department of education and workforce under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code to participate in the autism scholarship program or section 3310.58 of the Revised Code to participate in the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program. Sec. 4731.07. (A) The state medical board shall keep a record of its proceedings. The minutes of a meeting of the board shall, on approval by the board, constitute an official record of its proceedings. (B) The board shall keep a register of applicants for licenses and certificates issued under this chapter; licenses issued under Chapters 4730., 4760., 4762., 4772., 4774., and 4778., and 4789.; and licenses and limited permits issued under Chapters 4759. and 4761. of the Revised Code. The register shall show the name of the applicant and whether the applicant was granted or refused the license, certificate, or limited permit being sought. With respect to applicants to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, the register shall show the name of the institution that granted the applicant the degree of doctor of medicine or osteopathic medicine. With respect to applicants to practice respiratory care, the register shall show the addresses address of the person's last known place of business, the effective date and identification number of the license or limited permit, and, if applicable, the name and location of the institution that granted the person's degree or certificate of completion of respiratory care educational requirements and the date the degree or certificate of completion was issued. (C) The books and records of the board shall be prima-facie evidence of matters therein contained. Sec. 4731.071. The state medical board shall develop and publish on its internet web site a directory containing the names of, and business address for, all persons who hold current, valid certificates or licenses issued by the board under this chapter or Chapter 4730., 4759., 4760., 4761., 4762., 4772., 4774., or 4778., or 4789. of the Revised Code. Except as provided in section 4731.10 of the Revised Code, the directory shall be the sole source for verifying that a person holds a current, valid certificate or license issued by the board. Sec. 4731.224. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Criminal conduct" means any conduct that would constitute a felony, a misdemeanor committed in the course of medical practice, an offense of violence, or a sexually oriented offense, as defined in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether a criminal charge has been filed or the location in this state where the conduct occurred. (2) "Sexual misconduct" means conduct that exploits the licensee-patient relationship in a sexual way, whether verbal or physical, and may include the expression of thoughts, feelings, or gestures that are sexual or that reasonably may be construed by a patient as sexual. Sexual misconduct includes sexual impropriety, sexual contact, and sexual interaction as defined by the state medical board in rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Within thirty days after the imposition of any formal disciplinary action taken by any health care facility, including a hospital, health care facility operated by a health insuring corporation, ambulatory surgical center, or similar facility, against any individual holding a valid license or certificate to practice issued pursuant to this chapter, the chief administrator or executive officer of the facility shall report to the state medical board the name of the individual, the action taken by the facility, and a summary of the underlying facts leading to the action taken. Upon request, the board shall be provided certified copies of the patient records that were the basis for the facility's action. Prior to release to the board, the summary shall be approved by the peer review committee that reviewed the case or by the governing board of the facility. As used in this division, "formal disciplinary action" means any action resulting in the revocation, restriction, reduction, or termination of clinical privileges for violations of professional ethics, or for reasons of medical incompetence or medical malpractice. "Formal disciplinary action" includes a summary action, an action that takes effect notwithstanding any appeal rights that may exist, and an action that results in an individual surrendering clinical privileges while under investigation and during proceedings regarding the action being taken or in return for not being investigated or having proceedings held. "Formal disciplinary action" does not include any action taken for the sole reason of failure to maintain records on a timely basis or failure to attend staff or section meetings. The filing or nonfiling of a report with the board, investigation by the board, or any disciplinary action taken by the board, shall not preclude any action by a health care facility to suspend, restrict, or revoke the individual's clinical privileges. In the absence of fraud or bad faith, no individual or entity that provides patient records to the board shall be liable in damages to any person as a result of providing the records. (2) Within thirty days after commencing an investigation regarding criminal conduct or sexual misconduct against any individual holding a valid license or certificate to practice issued pursuant to this chapter, a health care facility, including a hospital, health care facility operated by a health insuring corporation, ambulatory surgical center, or similar facility, shall report to the board the name of the individual and a summary of the underlying facts related to the investigation being commenced. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section and subject to division (C)(3) of this section, if any individual authorized to practice under this chapter or any professional association or society of such individuals believes that a violation of any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4730., 4759., 4760., 4761., 4762., 4772., 4774., or 4778., or 4789. of the Revised Code, or any rule of the board has occurred, the individual, association, or society shall report to the board the information upon which the belief is based. (2) If any individual authorized to practice under this chapter or any professional association or society of such individuals believes that a violation of division (B)(19) or (26) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code has occurred, the individual, association, or society shall report the information upon which the belief is based to the monitoring organization conducting the confidential monitoring program established by the board under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. If any such report is made to the board, it shall be referred to the monitoring organization unless the board is aware that the individual who is the subject of the report does not meet the program eligibility requirements of section 4731.252 of the Revised Code. (3) If any individual authorized to practice under this chapter or any professional association or society of such individuals knows or has reasonable cause to suspect based on facts that would cause a reasonable person in a similar position to suspect that an individual authorized to practice under this chapter has committed or participated in criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, the information upon which the belief is based shall be reported to the board within thirty days. This division does not apply to a professional association or society whose staff interacts with members of the association or society only in advocacy, governance, or educational capacities and whose staff does not regularly interact with members in practice settings. (4) In addition to the self-reporting of criminal offenses that is required for license renewal, an individual authorized to practice under this chapter shall report to the board criminal charges regarding criminal conduct, sexual misconduct, or any conduct involving the use of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, including offenses that are equivalent offenses under division (A) of section 4511.181 of the Revised Code, violations of division (D) of section 4511.194 of the Revised Code, and violations of division (C) of section 4511.79 of the Revised Code. Reports under this division shall be made within thirty days of the criminal charge being filed. (D) Any professional association or society composed primarily of doctors of medicine and surgery, doctors of osteopathic medicine and surgery, doctors of podiatric medicine and surgery, or practitioners of limited branches of medicine that suspends or revokes an individual's membership for violations of professional ethics, or for reasons of professional incompetence or professional malpractice, within thirty days after a final decision shall report to the board, on forms prescribed and provided by the board, the name of the individual, the action taken by the professional organization, and a summary of the underlying facts leading to the action taken. The filing of a report with the board or decision not to file a report, investigation by the board, or any disciplinary action taken by the board, does not preclude a professional organization from taking disciplinary action against an individual. (E) Any insurer providing professional liability insurance to an individual authorized to practice under this chapter, or any other entity that seeks to indemnify the professional liability of such an individual, shall notify the board within thirty days after the final disposition of any written claim for damages where such disposition results in a payment exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars. The notice shall contain the following information: (1) The name and address of the person submitting the notification; (2) The name and address of the insured who is the subject of the claim; (3) The name of the person filing the written claim; (4) The date of final disposition; (5) If applicable, the identity of the court in which the final disposition of the claim took place. (F) The board may investigate possible violations of this chapter or the rules adopted under it that are brought to its attention as a result of the reporting requirements of this section, except that the board shall conduct an investigation if a possible violation involves repeated malpractice. As used in this division, "repeated malpractice" means three or more claims for medical malpractice within the previous five-year period, each resulting in a judgment or settlement in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars in favor of the claimant, and each involving negligent conduct by the practicing individual. (G) All summaries, reports, and records received and maintained by the board pursuant to this section shall be confidential pursuant to division (F)(5) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code. (H) Except for reports filed by an individual pursuant to division (B)(2) or (C) of this section, the board shall send a copy of any reports or summaries it receives pursuant to this section to the individual who is the subject of the reports or summaries. The individual shall have the right to file a statement with the board concerning the correctness or relevance of the information. The statement shall at all times accompany that part of the record in contention. (I) An individual or entity that, pursuant to this section, reports to the board, reports to the monitoring organization described in section 4731.25 of the Revised Code, or refers an impaired practitioner to a treatment provider approved by the board under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code shall not be subject to suit for civil damages as a result of the report, referral, or provision of the information. (J) In the absence of fraud or bad faith, no professional association or society of individuals authorized to practice under this chapter that sponsors a committee or program to provide peer assistance to practitioners with substance abuse problems, no representative or agent of such a committee or program, no representative or agent of the monitoring organization described in section 4731.25 of the Revised Code, and no member of the state medical board shall be held liable in damages to any person by reason of actions taken to refer a practitioner to a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code for examination or treatment. Sec. 4731.2210. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Key third party" means an individual closely involved in a patient's decision-making regarding health care services, including a patient's spouse or partner, parents, children, siblings, or guardians. An individual's status as a key third party ceases upon termination of a practitioner-patient relationship or termination of the relationship between a patient and the individual. (2) "Practitioner" means any of the following: (a) An individual authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, podiatric medicine and surgery, or a limited branch of medicine; (b) An individual licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code to practice as a physician assistant; (c) An individual authorized under Chapter 4759. of the Revised Code to practice as a dietitian; (d) An individual authorized under Chapter 4760. of the Revised Code to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant; (e) An individual authorized under Chapter 4761. of the Revised Code to practice respiratory care; (f) An individual authorized under Chapter 4762. of the Revised Code to practice as an acupuncturist; (g) An individual authorized under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code to practice as a certified mental health assistant; (h) An individual authorized under Chapter 4774. of the Revised Code to practice as a radiologist assistant; (i) An individual licensed under Chapter 4778. of the Revised Code to practice as a genetic counselor; (j) An individual licensed under Chapter 4789. of the Revised Code to practice naturopathic medicine. (3) "Sexual misconduct" has the same meaning as in section 4731.224 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the state medical board may require a practitioner that is subject to a probationary order of the board that involves a circumstance described in division (C) of this section, to provide to each patient, or to the patient's guardian or a key third party, a written disclosure signed by the practitioner that includes all of the following: (1) The practitioner's probation status; (2) The total length of the probation; (3) The probation end date; (4) Practice restrictions placed on the practitioner by the board; (5) The board's telephone number; (6) An explanation of how the patient can find additional information regarding the probation on the practitioner's profile page on the board's internet web site. The written disclosure, if required by the board, shall be provided before the patient's first visit following the probationary order of the board. The practitioner shall obtain a copy of the disclosure signed by the patient, or the patient's guardian or a key third party, and maintain the signed copy in the patient's medical record. The signed copy shall be made available to the board immediately upon request. (C) The written disclosure described in division (B) of this section applies in both of the following circumstances: (1) Issuance by the board of a final order, final adjudicative order under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, or a consent agreement that is ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board establishing any of the following: (a) Commission of any act of sexual misconduct with a patient or key third party; (b) Drug or alcohol abuse directly resulting in patient harm, or that impairs the ability of the practitioner to practice safely; (c) Criminal conviction directly resulting in harm to patient health; (d) Inappropriate prescribing directly resulting in patient harm. (2) A statement of issues alleged that the practitioner committed any of the acts described in divisions (C)(1)(a) through (d) and, notwithstanding a lack of admission of guilt, a consent agreement ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board includes express acknowledgement that the disclosure requirements of this section would serve to protect the public interest. (D) Written disclosure as described in this section is not required in the following circumstances: (1) The patient is unconscious or otherwise unable to comprehend the disclosure and sign it, and a guardian or a key third party is unavailable to comprehend and sign it; (2) The direct patient interaction occurs in an emergency department or otherwise occurs as an immediate result of a medical emergency; (3) The practitioner does not have a direct treatment relationship with the patient and does not have direct contact or direct communication with the patient. (E) The board shall provide the following information regarding practitioners on probation and those practicing under probationary status, in plain view on a practitioner's profile page on the board's internet web site: (1) Formal action documents detailing the citation, reports and recommendations, board order, and consent agreement; (2) The length of the probation and the end date; (3) Practice restrictions placed on the practitioner by the board. (F) The board shall provide a sample probation disclosure letter on its internet web site to be used by practitioners to comply with this section. Sec. 4731.24. Except as provided in sections 4731.281 and 4731.40 of the Revised Code, all receipts of the state medical board, from any source, shall be deposited in the state treasury. The funds shall be deposited to the credit of the state medical board operating fund, which is hereby created. Except as provided in sections 4730.252, 4731.225, 4731.244731.241, 4759.071, 4760.133, 4761.091, 4762.133, 4772.203, 4774.133, and 4778.141 of the Revised Code, all funds deposited into the state treasury under this section shall be used solely for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and Chapters 4730., 4759., 4760., 4761., 4762., 4772., 4774., and 4778., and 4789. of the Revised Code by the board. Sec. 4731.25. (A) As used in this section and in sections 4731.251 to 4731.255 of the Revised Code: (1) "Applicant" means an individual who has applied under Chapter 4730., 4731., 4759., 4760., 4761., 4762., 4772., 4774., or 4778., or 4789. of the Revised Code for a license, training or other certificate, limited permit, or other authority to practice as any one of the following practitioners: a physician assistant, physician, podiatrist, limited branch of medicine practitioner, dietitian, anesthesiologist assistant, respiratory care professional, acupuncturist, certified mental health assistant, radiologist assistant, or genetic counselor, or naturopath. "Applicant" may include an individual who has been granted authority by the state medical board to practice as one type of practitioner, but has applied for authority to practice as another type of practitioner. (2) "Impaired" or "impairment" means either or both of the following: (a) Impairment of ability to practice as described in division (B)(5) of section 4730.25, division (B)(26) of section 4731.22, division (A)(18) of section 4759.07, division (B)(6) of section 4760.13, division (A)(18) of section 4761.09, division (B)(6) of section 4762.13, division (B)(6) of section 4772.20, division (B)(6) of section 4774.13, or division (B)(6) of section 4778.14, or division (B)(19) of section 4789.10 of the Revised Code; (b) Inability to practice as described in division (B)(4) of section 4730.25, division (B)(19) of section 4731.22, division (A)(14) of section 4759.07, division (B)(5) of section 4760.13, division (A)(14) of section 4761.09, division (B)(5) of section 4762.13, division (B)(5) of section 4774.13, or division (B)(5) of section 4778.14, or division (B)(18) of section 4789.10 of the Revised Code. (3) "Practitioner" means any of the following: (a) An individual authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, podiatric medicine and surgery, or a limited branch of medicine; (b) An individual licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code to practice as a physician assistant; (c) An individual authorized under Chapter 4759. of the Revised Code to practice as a dietitian; (d) An individual authorized under Chapter 4760. of the Revised Code to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant; (e) An individual authorized under Chapter 4761. of the Revised Code to practice respiratory care; (f) An individual licensed under Chapter 4762. of the Revised Code to practice as an acupuncturist; (g) An individual licensed under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code to practice as a certified mental health assistant; (h) An individual licensed under Chapter 4774. of the Revised Code to practice as a radiologist assistant; (i) An individual licensed under Chapter 4778. of the Revised Code to practice as a genetic counselor; (j) An individual licensed under Chapter 4789. of the Revised Code to practice naturopathic medicine. (B) The state medical board shall establish a confidential, nondisciplinary program for the evaluation and treatment of practitioners and applicants who are, or may be, impaired and also meet the eligibility conditions described in section 4731.252 or 4731.253 of the Revised Code. The program shall be known as the confidential monitoring program. The board shall contract with a monitoring organization to conduct the program and perform monitoring services. To be qualified to contract with the board, an organization shall meet all of the following requirements: (1) Be a professionals health program sponsored by one or more professional associations or societies of practitioners; (2) Be organized as a not-for-profit entity and exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (3) Contract with or employ a medical director who is authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery and specializes or has training and expertise in addiction medicine; (4) Contract with or employ licensed health care professionals necessary for the organization's operation. (C) The monitoring organization shall do all of the following pursuant to the contract: (1) Receive from the board a referral regarding an applicant or receive any report of suspected practitioner impairment from any source, including from the board; (2) Notify a practitioner who is the subject of a report received under division (C)(1) of this section that the report has been made and that the practitioner may be eligible to participate in the program conducted under this section; (3) Provide a practitioner who is the subject of a report received under division (C)(1) of this section with the list of approved evaluators and treatment providers prepared and updated as described in section 4731.251 of the Revised Code; (4) Determine whether a practitioner reported or applicant referred to the monitoring organization is eligible to participate in the program, which in the case of an applicant may include evaluating records as described in division (E)(1)(d) of this section, and notify the practitioner or applicant of the determination; (5) In the case of a practitioner reported by a treatment provider, notify the treatment provider of the eligibility determination; (6) Report to the board any practitioner or applicant who is determined ineligible to participate in the program; (7) Refer an eligible practitioner who chooses to participate in the program for evaluation by an evaluator approved by the monitoring organization, unless the report received by the monitoring organization was made by an approved evaluator and the practitioner has already been evaluated; (8) Monitor the evaluation of an eligible practitioner; (9) Refer an eligible practitioner who chooses to participate in the program to a treatment provider approved by the monitoring organization; (10) Establish, in consultation with the treatment provider to which a practitioner is referred, the terms and conditions with which the practitioner must comply for continued participation in and successful completion of the program; (11) Report to the board any practitioner who does not complete evaluation or treatment or does not comply with any of the terms and conditions established by the monitoring organization and the treatment provider; (12) Perform any other activities specified in the contract with the board or that the monitoring organization considers necessary to comply with this section and sections 4731.251 to 4731.255 of the Revised Code. (D) The monitoring organization shall not disclose to the board the name of a practitioner or applicant or any records relating to a practitioner or applicant, unless any of the following occurs: (1) The practitioner or applicant is determined to be ineligible to participate in the program. (2) The practitioner or applicant requests the disclosure. (3) The practitioner or applicant is unwilling or unable to complete or comply with any part of the program, including evaluation, treatment, or monitoring. (4) The practitioner or applicant presents an imminent danger to oneself or the public, as a result of the practitioner's or applicant's impairment. (5) The practitioner's impairment has not been substantially alleviated by participation in the program. (E)(1) The monitoring organization shall develop procedures governing each of the following: (a) Receiving reports of practitioner impairment; (b) Notifying practitioners of reports and eligibility determinations; (c) Receiving applicant referrals as described in section 4731.253 of the Revised Code; (d) Evaluating records of referred applicants, in particular records from other jurisdictions regarding prior treatment for impairment or current or continued monitoring; (e) Notifying applicants of eligibility determinations; (f) Referring eligible practitioners for evaluation or treatment; (g) Establishing individualized treatment plans for eligible practitioners, as recommended by treatment providers; (h) Establishing individualized terms and conditions with which eligible practitioners or applicants must comply for continued participation in and successful completion of the program. (2) The monitoring organization, in consultation with the board, shall develop procedures governing each of the following: (a) Providing reports to the board on a periodic basis on the total number of practitioners or applicants participating in the program, without disclosing the names or records of any program participants other than those about whom reports are required by this section; (b) Reporting to the board any practitioner or applicant who due to impairment presents an imminent danger to oneself or the public; (c) Reporting to the board any practitioner or applicant who is unwilling or unable to complete or comply with any part of the program, including evaluation, treatment, or monitoring; (d) Reporting to the board any practitioner or applicant whose impairment was not substantially alleviated by participation in the program. Sec. 4731.251. (A) In addition to the duties described in section 4731.25 of the Revised Code, the monitoring organization shall conduct a review of individuals and entities providing impairment evaluation and treatment services to determine which should be approved as evaluators and treatment providers by the organization. The individuals and entities may include those with experience providing evaluation and treatment services as part of a professionals health program sponsored by one or more professional associations or societies of practitioners. The monitoring organization shall conduct its review in accordance with criteria developed under this section. Following its review, the monitoring organization shall grant or deny approval to evaluators and treatment providers, which may include physicians and facilities. The monitoring organization shall prepare a list of evaluators approved to serve under the program and a list of treatment providers approved to serve under the program or as described in division (B)(5) of section 4730.25, division (B)(26) of section 4731.22, division (A)(18) of section 4759.07, division (B)(6) of section 4760.13, division (A)(18) of section 4761.09, division (B)(6) of section 4762.13, division (B)(6) of section 4772.20, division (B)(6) of section 4774.13, or division (B)(6) of section 4778.14, or division (B)(19) of section 4789.10 of the Revised Code. In accordance with criteria developed under this section, the monitoring organization shall periodically review and update the list of approved evaluators and treatment providers, including by examining evaluator and treatment provider outcomes and operations. As part of its periodic review, the organization may approve additional evaluators or treatment providers and add them to the list. The organization also may withdraw approval for evaluators and treatment providers. Such additions and withdrawals shall be reflected in the list. (B) The monitoring organization and state medical board together shall develop criteria and procedures for the review and approval of impairment evaluators and treatment providers. The criteria and procedures shall address reviews conducted on a periodic basis, including the examination of approved evaluator and treatment provider outcomes and operations. (C) Separate from the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code, the board may contract with the monitoring organization to assist the board in monitoring impaired practitioners who are subject to formal disciplinary action by the board. (D) Any practitioner who is evaluated or treated as part of the confidential monitoring program, who enters into a participation agreement with the monitoring organization, or who is treated by an approved treatment provider shall be deemed to have waived any confidentiality requirements that would otherwise prevent the monitoring organization or treatment provider from making reports required under sections 4731.25 to 4731.255 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4776.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "License" means an authorization evidenced by a license, certificate, registration, permit, card, or other authority that is issued or conferred by a licensing agency to a licensee or to an applicant for an initial license by which the licensee or initial license applicant has or claims the privilege to engage in a profession, occupation, or occupational activity, or, except in the case of the state dental board, to have control of and operate certain specific equipment, machinery, or premises, over which the licensing agency has jurisdiction. (B) Except as provided in section 4776.20 of the Revised Code, "licensee" means the person to whom the license is issued by a licensing agency. "Licensee" includes a person who, for purposes of section 3796.13 of the Revised Code, has complied with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code and has been determined by the division of cannabis control, as the applicable licensing agency, to meet the requirements for employment. (C) Except as provided in section 4776.20 of the Revised Code, "licensing agency" means any of the following: (1) The board authorized by Chapters 4701., 4717., 4725., 4729., 4730., 4731., 4732., 4734., 4740., 4741., 4747., 4751., 4753., 4755., 4757., 4759., 4760., 4761., 4762., 4772., 4774., 4778., 4779., and 4783., and 4789. of the Revised Code to issue a license to engage in a specific profession, occupation, or occupational activity, or to have charge of and operate certain specific equipment, machinery, or premises. (2) The state dental board, relative to its authority to issue a license pursuant to section 4715.12, 4715.16, 4715.21, or 4715.27 of the Revised Code; (3) The division of marijuana control, relative to its authority under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code and any rules adopted under that chapter with respect to a person who is subject to section 3796.13 of the Revised Code; (4) The director of agriculture, relative to the director's authority to issue licenses under Chapter 928. of the Revised Code. (D) "Applicant for an initial license" includes persons seeking a license for the first time and persons seeking a license by reciprocity, endorsement, or similar manner of a license issued in another state. "Applicant for an initial license" also includes a person who, for purposes of section 3796.13 of the Revised Code, is required to comply with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code. (E) "Applicant for a restored license" includes persons seeking restoration of a license under section 4730.14, 4730.28, 4731.222, 4731.281, 4759.062, 4759.063, 4760.06, 4760.061, 4761.06, 4761.061, 4762.06, 4762.061, 4772.08, 4772.082, 4774.06, 4774.061, 4778.07, or 4778.071, 4789.07, or 4789.08 of the Revised Code. "Applicant for a restored license" does not include a person seeking restoration of a license under section 4751.33 of the Revised Code. (F) "Criminal records check" has the same meaning as in section 109.572 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4776.20. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Licensing agency" means, in addition to each board or other government entity identified in division (C) of section 4776.01 of the Revised Code, the board or other government entity authorized to issue a license under Chapters 3776., 4703., 4707., 4709., 4712., 4713., 4719., 4723., 4727., 4728., 4733., 4735., 4737., 4738., 4740., 4747., 4749., 4752., 4753., 4758., 4759., 4763., 4764., 4765., 4766., 4771., 4773., and 4781., and 4789. of the Revised Code. "Licensing agency" includes an administrative officer that has authority to issue a license. (2) "Licensee" means, in addition to a licensee as described in division (B) of section 4776.01 of the Revised Code, the person to whom a license is issued by the board or other government entity authorized to issue a license under Chapters 3776., 4703., 4707., 4709., 4712., 4713., 4719., 4723., 4727., 4728., 4733., 4735., 4737., 4738., 4740., 4747., 4749., 4751., 4752., 4753., 4758., 4759., 4763., 4764., 4765., 4766., 4771., 4773., and 4781., and 4789. of the Revised Code. (3) "Prosecutor" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (B) On a licensee's conviction of, plea of guilty to, judicial finding of guilt of, or judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to the offense of trafficking in persons in violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code, the prosecutor in the case shall promptly notify the licensing agency of the conviction, plea, or finding and provide the licensee's name and residential address. On receipt of this notification, the licensing agency shall immediately suspend the licensee's license. (C) If there is a conviction of, plea of guilty to, judicial finding of guilt of, or judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to the offense of trafficking in persons in violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code and all or part of the violation occurred on the premises of a facility that is licensed by a licensing agency, the prosecutor in the case shall promptly notify the licensing agency of the conviction, plea, or finding and provide the facility's name and address and the offender's name and residential address. On receipt of this notification, the licensing agency shall immediately suspend the facility's license. (D) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, the suspension of a license under division (B) or (C) of this section shall be implemented by a licensing agency without a prior hearing. After the suspension, the licensing agency shall give written notice to the subject of the suspension of the right to request a hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. After a hearing is held, the licensing agency shall either revoke or permanently revoke the license of the subject of the suspension, unless it determines that the license holder has not been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, been found guilty of, or been found guilty based on a plea of no contest to the offense of trafficking in persons in violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4789.02. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, no individual shall knowingly practice naturopathic medicine unless the individual holds a current, valid license issued under this chapter. (2) Division (A)(1) of this section does not apply to any of the following: (a) An individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery; (b) A physician assistant licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code; (c) A registered nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code, including an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under that chapter; (d) A dietitian licensed under Chapter 4759. of the Revised Code. (B) No individual shall knowingly represent the individual's self as any of the following unless the individual holds a current, valid license issued under this chapter: (1) A naturopathic physician; (2) A naturopathic doctor; (3) A naturopath; (4) A doctor of naturopathic medicine or naturopathy; (5) An "N.D." or "ND"; (6) A practitioner or provider of naturopathic medicine, naturopathic health care, or naturopathy. Sec. 4789.03. (A) The state medical board shall implement and administer this chapter. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, the board may adopt any rules necessary to govern the practice of naturopathic medicine and the administration and enforcement of this chapter. Rules adopted under this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (2) In adopting rules under this section, the board shall not limit the naturopathic devices, substances, and therapies that the holder of a license to practice naturopathic medicine issued under this chapter may administer, furnish, order, perform, or prescribe as described in division (A) of section 4789.09 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4789.04. (A) An individual seeking a license to practice naturopathic medicine shall submit to the state medical board an application in a manner prescribed by the board. The application shall include all the information the board considers necessary to process the application, including evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant meets the requirements specified in division (B) of this section. At the time an application is submitted, the applicant shall pay the board an application fee of three hundred five dollars. No part of the fee shall be returned to the applicant or transferred for purposes of another application. (B) To be eligible to receive a license to practice as naturopathic medicine, an applicant shall demonstrate to the board that the applicant meets all of the following requirements: (1) The applicant is at least eighteen years of age. (2) The applicant meets the educational requirements of division (A) or (B) of section 4789.05 of the Revised Code. (3) The applicant passed a competency-based national naturopathic licensing examination administered by the north American board of naturopathic examiners or a successor organization recognized by the state medical board. (4) Notwithstanding section 9.79 of the Revised Code, the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant has a good, ethical, and professional reputation. (5) The applicant has not had a license to practice naturopathic medicine or other health care license, certificate, or registration refused, revoked, or suspended by any other jurisdiction for reasons that relate to the applicant's ability to skillfully and safely practice naturopathic medicine unless that license, certificate, or registration has been restored to good standing by that jurisdiction. (6) The applicant complies with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code. (C) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the board shall review all applications received under this section. After receiving an application it considers complete, the board shall determine whether the applicant meets the requirements for a license to practice naturopathic medicine. If the board determines that an applicant meets the requirements for a license to practice naturopathic medicine, the secretary of the board shall issue the license to the applicant. The license shall be valid for a two-year period unless revoked or suspended, shall expire on the date that is two years after the date of issuance, and may be renewed for additional two-year periods in accordance with section 4789.06 of the Revised Code. (D) The board shall issue a license to practice naturopathic medicine in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter to practice naturopathic medicine in a state that does not issue a license to practice naturopathic medicine. Sec. 4789.05. To be eligible for a license to practice naturopathic medicine under this chapter, an applicant shall meet one of the following educational requirements: (A) Hold a doctoral degree of naturopathy or naturopathic medicine from a naturopathic medical education program in the United States, or a degree-equivalent diploma from a naturopathic medical education program offered by a college or university in Canada, provided that the program meets all of the following requirements at the time the degree or diploma was conferred: (1) The program offered graduate-level full-time didactic and supervised clinical training. (2) The program was accredited, or reached candidacy status for accreditation, by the council on naturopathic medical education. (3) If the program is in the United States, the program was, or was part of, a college or university that was accredited, or reached candidacy status for accreditation, by a regional or national institutional accrediting agency recognized by the United States secretary of education. (4) If the program is in Canada, the program had provincial approval for participation in government-funded student aid programs. (B) Hold a doctoral naturopathic medical degree or degree-equivalent diploma from a college or university that was conferred to the applicant before the existence of the council on naturopathic medical education, provided that the program meets all of the following requirements: (1) At the time the degree or diploma was conferred, the program offered a full-time structured curriculum in basic sciences and supervised patient care. (2) At the time the degree or diploma was conferred, the program was at least one hundred thirty-two weeks in duration and required completion of the program within a period of not less than thirty-five months. (3) At the time the degree or diploma was conferred, the program was, or was part of a college of naturopathic medicine, or college of liberal arts and naturopathic medicine, that was reputable and in good standing in the state medical board's judgment. (4) If the program still exists, the program is accredited by the council on naturopathic medical education at the time the applicant applies for a license under this chapter. (5) If the program still exists and was, or was part of, a college or university in Canada, the program has provincial approval for participation in government-funded student aid programs at the time the applicant applies for a license under this chapter. Sec. 4789.06. (A) An individual seeking to renew a license to practice naturopathic medicine shall, on or before the license's expiration date, apply to the state medical board for renewal. The board shall provide renewal notices to license holders at least one month prior to the expiration date. Renewal applications shall be submitted to the board in a manner prescribed by the board. Each application shall be accompanied by a renewal fee of three hundred five dollars. The applicant shall report any criminal offense to which the applicant has pleaded guilty, of which the applicant has been found guilty, or for which the applicant has been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction, since last signing an application for a license to practice naturopathic medicine. (B) To be eligible for renewal, a naturopath shall certify to the board that the naturopath has completed continuing education requirements that, as established by the board, are equivalent to the continuing education requirements applicable to an individual holding a license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery issued under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code. (C) If an applicant submits a renewal application that the board considers to be complete and qualifies for renewal pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall issue to the applicant a renewed license to practice naturopathic medicine. (D) The board may require a random sample of naturopaths to submit materials documenting compliance with division (B) of this section. This division does not limit the board's authority to conduct investigations pursuant to section 4787.10 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) If, through a random sample conducted under division (D) of this section or through any other means, the board finds that an individual who certified completion of the continuing education required to renew, reinstate, restore, or reactivate a license to practice did not complete the requisite continuing education, the board may do either of the following: (a) Take disciplinary action against the individual under section 4787.10 of the Revised Code, impose a civil penalty, or both; (b) Permit the individual to agree in writing to complete the continuing education and pay a civil penalty. (2) The board's finding in any disciplinary action taken under division (E)(1)(a) of this section shall be made pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members. (3) A civil penalty imposed under division (E)(1)(a) of this section or paid under division (E)(1)(b) of this section shall be in an amount specified by the board of not more than five thousand dollars. The board shall deposit civil penalties in accordance with section 4731.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4789.07. (A) A license to practice naturopathic medicine that is not renewed on or before its expiration date is automatically suspended on its expiration date. Continued practice after suspension shall be considered as practicing in violation of section 4789.02 of the Revised Code. (B) If a license has been suspended pursuant to division (A) of this section for two years or less, it may be reinstated. The state medical board shall reinstate the license upon the applicant's submission of a complete renewal application and payment of a reinstatement fee of four hundred five dollars. (C) If a license has been suspended pursuant to division (A) of this section for more than two years, it may be restored. Subject to section 4789.08 of the Revised Code, the board may restore the license upon an applicant's submission of a complete restoration application and a restoration fee of five hundred five dollars and compliance with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code. The board shall not restore a license unless the board, in its discretion, decides that the results of the criminal records check do not make the applicant ineligible for a license issued pursuant to section 4789.04 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4789.08. (A) This section applies to both of the following: (1) An applicant seeking restoration of a license issued under this chapter that has been in a suspended or inactive state for any cause for more than two years; (2) An applicant seeking issuance of a license pursuant to this chapter who for more than two years has not been engaged in the practice of naturopathic medicine. (B) Before issuing a license to an applicant subject to this section, or before restoring a license to good standing for an applicant subject to this section, the state medical board may impose terms and conditions including any one or more of the following: (1) Requiring the applicant to pass an oral or written examination, or both, to determine the applicant's present fitness to resume practice; (2) Requiring the applicant to obtain additional training and to pass an examination upon completion of such training; (3) Requiring an assessment of the applicant's physical skills for purposes of determining whether the applicant's coordination, fine motor skills, and dexterity are sufficient for performing evaluations and procedures in a manner that meets the minimal standards of care; (4) Requiring an assessment of the applicant's skills in recognizing and understanding diseases and conditions; (5) Requiring the applicant to undergo a comprehensive physical examination, which may include an assessment of physical abilities, evaluation of sensory capabilities, or screening for the presence of neurological disorders; (6) Restricting or limiting the extent, scope, or type of practice of the applicant. The board shall consider the moral background and the activities of the applicant during the period of suspension, inactivity, or retirement. The board shall not issue, restore, or reactivate a license under this section unless the applicant complies with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4789.09. (A) The holder of a license to practice naturopathic medicine issued under this chapter may do any of the following: (1) Order and perform physical and laboratory examinations for diagnostic purposes, including phlebotomy, clinical laboratory tests, orificial examinations, and physiological function tests; (2) Order diagnostic imaging studies; (3) Administer, furnish, order, perform, or prescribe naturopathic devices, substances, and therapies, including those in any of the following categories: (a) Food and food extracts; (b) Nutraceuticals; (c) Vitamins; (d) Amino acids; (e) Minerals; (f) Enzymes; (g) Botanicals and botanical extracts; (h) Botanical medicines; (i) Homeopathic medicines; (j) Dietary supplements, as defined by the "Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act," 21 U.S.C. 301, et seq., and dietary substances; (k) Nonprescription drugs and over-the-counter preparations; (l) Hot or cold hydrotherapy; (m) Naturopathic physical medicine; (n) Electromagnetic therapy; (o) Therapeutic exercise; (p) Devices, including therapeutic devices, barrier contraception, and durable medical equipment; (q) Health education and health counseling; (r) Repair and care incidental to superficial lacerations and abrasions; (s) Removal of foreign bodies located in superficial tissue; (t) Musculoskeletal manipulation; (u) Any other therapies approved by the state medical board. (4) When administering a device, substance, or therapy as described in division (A)(3) of this section, utilize routes of administration that include oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal, transdermal, intradermal, subcutaneous, intravenous, or intramuscular routes. (B) A license issued under this chapter does not authorize its holder to do any of the following: (1) Prescribe, furnish, or administer prescription drugs or devices; (2) Perform surgical procedures, except for methods of repair and care incidental to superficial lacerations and abrasions, superficial lesions, or the removal of foreign bodies located in superficial tissue; (3) Practice or claim to practice as a medical doctor, osteopath, dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, dietitian, chiropractor, physical therapist, acupuncturist, or any other health care professional; (4) Use topical and local anesthetics for pain relief or for the repair of superficial lacerations; (5) Administer ionizing radioactive substances for therapeutic purposes; (6) Perform surgical procedures using a laser device; (7) Perform surgical procedures involving the eye, ear, tendons, nerves, veins, or arteries extending beyond superficial tissue; (8) Perform chiropractic adjustments or musculoskeletal manipulation; (9) Perform acupuncture. Sec. 4789.10. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, may refuse to grant a license to practice naturopathic medicine to, or may revoke the license held by, an individual found by the board to have committed fraud during the administration of the examination to be licensed as a naturopath or to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the license. (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, the board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license to practice naturopathic medicine, refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew a license, refuse to reinstate a license, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license for any of the following reasons: (1) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter; (2) Permitting the holder's name or license to be used by another individual; (3) Failure to employ acceptable scientific methods in the selection of modalities for treatment provided under a license to practice naturopathic medicine; (4) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for a violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug; (5) Willfully betraying a professional confidence; (6) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in the solicitation of or advertising for patients, in relation to the practice of naturopathic medicine, or in securing or attempting to secure any license to practice issued by the board; (7) A departure from, or the failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances, whether or not actual injury to a patient is established; (8) Representing, with the purpose of obtaining compensation or other advantage as personal gain or for any other individual, that an incurable disease or injury, or other incurable condition, can be permanently cured; (9) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or anything of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of the practice of naturopathic medicine; (10) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for a felony; (11) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (12) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for a misdemeanor committed in the course of the practice of naturopathic medicine; (13) Commission of an act in the course of the practice of naturopathic medicine that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (14) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (15) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (16) Violation of the conditions of limitation placed by the board on a license to practice naturopathic medicine; (17) Failure to pay license renewal fees required by this chapter; (18) Inability to practice naturopathic medicine according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (19) Impairment of ability to practice naturopathic medicine according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that impair the ability to practice; (20) Failure to maintain the confidentiality of privileged communications without the written consent of a patient or a patient's parent or guardian, as applicable, unless otherwise required by law, court order, or necessity to protect public health and safety; (21) Failure to comply with the continuing education requirements necessary to renew a license to practice naturopathic medicine; (22) Failure to comply with any standards for the ethical practice of naturopathic medicine that the board adopts; (23) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under division (E) of this section, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board in an investigative interview. (C) The board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (D) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with a naturopath or applicant to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. A telephone conference call may be utilized for ratification of a consent agreement that revokes or suspends an individual's license. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. (E) For purposes of divisions (B)(11), (13), and (15) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the applicant or license holder committed the act in question. The board does not have jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court renders a final judgment in the license holder's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board has jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court issues an order of dismissal on technical or procedural grounds. (F) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect on a prior board order entered under the provisions of this section or on the board's jurisdiction to take action under the provisions of this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing or took other formal action under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (G) For purposes of this division, any individual who holds a license to practice naturopathic medicine, or applies for a license, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (1) In enforcing division (B)(5) of this section, the board, on a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who holds, or has applied for, a license issued under this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the program established by the board under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. A physical examination may include an HIV test. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds a naturopath unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (B)(5) of this section, the board shall require the naturopath to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license to practice. An individual affected by this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practicing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. (2) For purposes of division (B)(19) of this section, if the board has reason to believe that any individual who holds a license to practice naturopathic medicine or any applicant for a license suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the program established by the board under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician qualified to conduct such examination and approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license suspended under this division, the naturopath shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The demonstration shall include the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making such assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license suspended under this division after such demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired naturopath resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the naturopath. The monitoring shall include monitoring of compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, on termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of falsification stating whether the naturopath has maintained sobriety. (H)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend an individual's license to practice without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine both of the following: (i) That there is clear and convincing evidence that a naturopath has violated division (B) of this section; (ii) That the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a license holder has been charged in any state or federal court for a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, on review of the allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If the naturopath requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the naturopath requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the naturopath. (3) Any summary suspension imposed under division (H)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. Failure to issue the order within seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order, but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (I) If the board takes action under division (B)(10), (12), or (14) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, on exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. On receipt of a petition and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the license to practice naturopathic medicine. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of opportunity for hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act, or if no hearing is requested, it may order any of the sanctions specified in division (B) of this section. (J) The license to practice naturopathic medicine and the naturopath's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the naturopath pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after the suspension shall be considered practicing without a license. The board shall serve the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license is suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license to practice. (K) In any instance in which the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of opportunity for hearing and the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (L) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the license of the naturopath may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (M) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license to practice naturopathic medicine to an applicant, revokes an individual's license, refuses to renew an individual's license, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license to practice naturopathic medicine, and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or for issuance of a new license. (N) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license to practice naturopathic medicine is not effective unless or until accepted by the board. A telephone conference call may be utilized for acceptance of the surrender of an individual's license. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. Reinstatement of a license surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application made under this chapter for a license to practice may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license in accordance with section 4787.06 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) At the request of the board, a license holder shall immediately surrender to the board a license that the board has suspended, revoked, or permanently revoked. Sec. 4789.11. On receipt of a notice pursuant to section 3123.43 of the Revised Code, the state medical board shall comply with sections 3123.41 to 3123.50 of the Revised Code and any applicable rules adopted under section 3123.63 of the Revised Code with respect to a license to practice naturopathic medicine issued under this chapter. Sec. 4789.12. The state medical board shall comply with section 4776.20 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4789.99. Whoever violates division (A) or (B) of section 4789.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. Section 2. That existing sections 109.572, 4731.07, 4731.071, 4731.224, 4731.2210, 4731.24, 4731.25, 4731.251, 4776.01, and 4776.20 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Section 4731.224 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by both S.B. 95 and S.B. 109 of the 135th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.